North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE II ELECTIVE FRANCHISE

Section 1. [General election and elector qualifications]

The general election of the state shall be held biennially as provided by law.

Only a citizen of the United States, who has attained the age of eighteen years and who is a North Dakota resident, shall be a qualified elector. When an elector moves within the state, he shall be entitled to vote in the precinct from which he moves
until he establishes voting residence in another precinct. The legislative assembly shall provide by law for the determination of residence for voting eligibility, other than physical presence. No elector shall lose his residency for
voting eligibility solely by reason of his absence from the state.

The legislative assembly shall provide by law for secrecy in voting, for absentee voting, for administration of elections and for the nomination of candidates.

Section 2. [Elector disqualifications]

No person who has been declared mentally incompetent by order of a court or other authority having jurisdiction, which order has not been rescinded, shall be qualified to vote. No person convicted of a felony shall be qualified to vote until his or her
civil rights are restored.

Section 3.

Only a qualified elector may vote in any general, special, or primary election for a federal, statewide, state legislative, district, county, township, city, or school district office, or for a statewide, district, or political subdivision ballot measure.